South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5473.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Florence County fishing SECTION 1.    Chapter 19, Title 50 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 15 Florence County Fishing Section 50-19-810.    Notwithstanding another provision of law, it is unlawful for any person to fish at any time on the causeway crossing Forest Lake on Knollwood Road, also known as J. Foster Jeffords Causeway, in Florence County. Any person found guilty of violating the provision of this section shall be fined not more than the sum of twenty-five dollars or be confined for a period not more than thirty days, in the discretion of the court, for each separate offense. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 14th day of May, 2026. Approved the 19th day of May, 2026. __________